Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Personal Property Presumed Abandoned; General Rules.

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

derive from the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act of 1981.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 133, SLA 1986, provides that AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

“does not apply to personal property already delivered to the state or already the subject of escheat proceedings before September 7, 1986.”

Collateral references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d, Abandoned, Lost, and Unclaimed Property, § 1 et seq.

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Escheat, §§ 7, 9, 34, 44, 45.

30A C.J.S., Escheat, §§ 4-6, 22.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes implementing the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act or its predecessor — modern status.
29 ALR6th 507.

Sec. 34.45.110.
General rule for property presumed abandoned.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

34.45.120

—

34.45.780

, all intangible property, including income or increment derived from the property, less lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course of a holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.

Property is payable or distributable for the purposes of AS

34.45.120

—

34.45.780

even if the owner failed to demand the property or to present an instrument or document required to receive payment of the property.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, the changes made by that 2004 Act apply to property that, on June 26, 2004, already was subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act or that, on or after June 26, 2004, becomes subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act.
See § 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 90, SLA 2004 (SB 231), amending this section, see 2003 Senate Journal 1721 - 1722.

Sec. 34.45.120.
General rules for taking custody of unclaimed intangible property.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by another statute of the state, intangible property is subject to the custody of the state as unclaimed property if the conditions raising a presumption of abandonment under AS

34.45.110

or

34.45.140

—

34.45.260

are satisfied and

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in the state;

the records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in the state;

the records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner, and it is established that

the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in the state, or

the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency, including a municipality, of the state and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property;

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a state that either does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property, and the holder is a domiciliary, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, including a municipality, of the state;

the last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a foreign nation and the holder is a domiciliary, government, or governmental subdivision, including a municipality, or agency of the state; or

the transaction out of which the property arose occurred in the state and

the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown, or the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is in a state that either does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law does not apply to the property, and

the holder is a domiciliary of a state that either does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law does not apply to the property.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)